src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-unimorphstuff_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
    apātõks+N+Pl+Ins: apātõkstõks
    apātõks+N+Pl+Ill: apātõkšiz
    apātõks+N+Pl+Ine: apātõkšis
    apātõks+N+Pl+Ela: apātõkšist
    apātõksi+N+Sg+Nom: apātõksi
    apātõksi+N+Sg+Gen: apātõksiz
    apātõksi+N+Sg+Dat: apātõksizõn
    apātõksi+N+Sg+Par: apātõksizt
    apātõksi+N+Sg+Ins: apātõksizõks
    apātõksi+N+Sg+Ill: apātõksizõ
    apātõksi+N+Sg+Ine: apātõksizõs
    apātõksi+N+Sg+Ela: apātõksizõst
    apātõksi+N+Pl+Nom: apātõksizt
    apātõksi+N+Pl+Gen: apātõksizt
    apātõksi+N+Pl+Dat: apātõksiztõn
    apātõksi+N+Pl+Par: apātõksiži
    apātõksi+N+Pl+Ins: apātõksiztõks
    apātõksi+N+Pl+Ill: apātõksižiz
    apātõksi+N+Pl+Ine: apātõksižis
    apātõksi+N+Pl+Ela: apātõksižist
    aplōka+N+Sg+Nom: aplōka
    aplōka+N+Sg+Gen: aplōka
    aplōka+N+Sg+Dat: aplōkan
    aplōka+N+Sg+Par: aploukõ
    aplōka+N+Sg+Ins: aplōkaks
    aplōka+N+Sg+Ill: aploukõ
    aplōka+N+Sg+Ine: aplōkas
    aplōka+N+Sg+Ela: aplōkast
    aplōka+N+Pl+Nom: aplōkad
    aplōka+N+Pl+Gen: aplōkad
    aplōka+N+Pl+Dat: aplōkadõn
    aplōka+N+Pl+Par: aplouḑi
    aplōka+N+Pl+Ins: aplōkadõks
    aplōka+N+Pl+Ill: aplōkiž
    aplōka+N+Pl+Ine: aplōkis
    aplōka+N+Pl+Ela: aplōkist
    aplōka+N+Sg+Nom: aplōka
    aplōka+N+Sg+Gen: aplōka
    aplōka+N+Sg+Dat: aplōkan
    aplōka+N+Sg+Par: aploukõ
    aplōka+N+Sg+Ins: aplōkaks
    aplōka+N+Sg+Ill: aploukõ
    aplōka+N+Sg+Ine: aplōkas
    aplōka+N+Sg+Ela: aplōkast
    aplōka+N+Pl+Nom: aplōkad
    aplōka+N+Pl+Gen: aplōkad
    aplōka+N+Pl+Dat: aplōkadõn
    aplōka+N+Pl+Par: aplouḑi
    aplōka+N+Pl+Ins: aplōkadõks
    aplōka+N+Pl+Ill: aplōkiž
    aplōka+N+Pl+Ine: aplōkis
    aplōka+N+Pl+Ela: aplōkist
    apostõl+N+Sg+Nom: apostõl
    apostõl+N+Sg+Gen: apostõl
    apostõl+N+Sg+Dat: apostõlõn
    apostõl+N+Sg+Par: apostõlt
    apostõl+N+Sg+Ins: apostõlõks
    apostõl+N+Sg+Ill: apostõlõ
    apostõl+N+Sg+Ine: apostõlõs
    apostõl+N+Sg+Ela: apostõlõst
    apostõl+N+Pl+Nom: apostõld
    apostõl+N+Pl+Gen: apostõld
    apostõl+N+Pl+Dat: apostõldõn
    apostõl+N+Pl+Par: apostiļi
    apostõl+N+Pl+Ins: apostõldõks
    apostõl+N+Pl+Ill: apostiļiž
    apostõl+N+Pl+Ine: apostiļis
    apostõl+N+Pl+Ela: apostiļist
    apostrōf+N+Sg+Nom: apostrōf
    apostrōf+N+Sg+Gen: apostrōf
    apostrōf+N+Sg+Dat: apostrōfõn
    apostrōf+N+Sg+Par: apostrōfõ
    apostrōf+N+Sg+Ins: apostrōfõks
    apostrōf+N+Sg+Ill: apostrōfõ
    apostrōf+N+Sg+Ine: apostrōfsõ
    apostrōf+N+Sg+Ela: [apostrōfstõ, apostrōfst]
    apostrōf+N+Pl+Nom: apostrōfõd
    apostrōf+N+Pl+Gen: apostrōfõd
    apostrōf+N+Pl+Dat: apostrōfõdõn
    apostrōf+N+Pl+Par: apostrōfidi
    apostrōf+N+Pl+Ins: apostrōfõdõks
    apostrōf+N+Pl+Ill: apostrōfiž
    apostrōf+N+Pl+Ine: apostrōfis
    apostrōf+N+Pl+Ela: apostrōfist
    appāina+N+Sg+Nom: appāina
    appāina+N+Sg+Gen: appāina
    appāina+N+Sg+Dat: appāinan
    appāina+N+Sg+Par: appainõ
    appāina+N+Sg+Ins: appāinaks
    appāina+N+Sg+Ill: appainõ
    appāina+N+Sg+Ine: appāinas
    appāina+N+Sg+Ela: appāinast
    appāina+N+Pl+Nom: appāinad
    appāina+N+Pl+Gen: appāinad
    appāina+N+Pl+Dat: appāinadõn
    appāina+N+Pl+Par: appaiņi
    appāina+N+Pl+Ins: appāinadõks
    appāina+N+Pl+Ill: appāiniž
    appāina+N+Pl+Ine: appāinis
    appāina+N+Pl+Ela: appāinist
    appiņ+N+Sg+Nom: appiņ
    appiņ+N+Sg+Gen: appiņ
    appiņ+N+Sg+Dat: appiņõn
    appiņ+N+Sg+Par: appiņt
    appiņ+N+Sg+Ins: appiņõks
    appiņ+N+Sg+Ill: appiņõ
    appiņ+N+Sg+Ine: appiņš
    appiņ+N+Sg+Ela: appiņšt
    appiņ+N+Pl+Nom: appiņd
    appiņ+N+Pl+Gen: appiņd
    appiņ+N+Pl+Dat: appiņdõn
    appiņ+N+Pl+Par: appiņi
    appiņ+N+Pl+Ins: appiņdõks
    appiņ+N+Pl+Ill: appiņiž
    appiņ+N+Pl+Ine: appiņis
    appiņ+N+Pl+Ela: appiņist
    appõkǭrt+N+Sg+Nom: appõkǭrt
    appõkǭrt+N+Sg+Gen: appõkǭrt
    appõkǭrt+N+Sg+Dat: appõkǭrtõn
    appõkǭrt+N+Sg+Par: appõkǭrtõ
    appõkǭrt+N+Sg+Ins: appõkǭrtõks
    appõkǭrt+N+Sg+Ill: appõkǭrtõ
    appõkǭrt+N+Sg+Ine: appõkǭrtõs
    appõkǭrt+N+Sg+Ela: appõkǭrtõst
    appõkǭrt+N+Pl+Nom: appõkǭrtõd
    appõkǭrt+N+Pl+Gen: appõkǭrtõd
    appõkǭrt+N+Pl+Dat: appõkǭrtõdõn
    appõkǭrt+N+Pl+Par: appõkǭrtidi
    appõkǭrt+N+Pl+Ins: appõkǭrtõdõks
    appõkǭrt+N+Pl+Ill: appõkǭrtiž
    appõkǭrt+N+Pl+Ine: appõkǭrtis
    appõkǭrt+N+Pl+Ela: appõkǭrtist
    appõlsin+N+Sg+Nom: appõlsin
    appõlsin+N+Sg+Gen: appõlsin
    appõlsin+N+Sg+Dat: appõlsinõn
    appõlsin+N+Sg+Par: appõlsinõ
    appõlsin+N+Sg+Ins: appõlsinõks
    appõlsin+N+Sg+Ill: appõlsinõ
    appõlsin+N+Sg+Ine: appõlsins
    appõlsin+N+Sg+Ela: appõlsinst
    appõlsin+N+Pl+Nom: appõlsinõd
    appõlsin+N+Pl+Gen: appõlsinõd
    appõlsin+N+Pl+Dat: appõlsinõdõn
    appõlsin+N+Pl+Par: appõlsinidi
    appõlsin+N+Pl+Ins: appõlsinõdõks
    appõlsin+N+Pl+Ill: appõlsiniž
    appõlsin+N+Pl+Ine: appõlsinis
    appõlsin+N+Pl+Ela: appõlsinist
    appõn+N+Sg+Nom: appõn
    appõn+N+Sg+Gen: appõn
    appõn+N+Sg+Dat: appõnõn
    appõn+N+Sg+Par: appõnt
    appõn+N+Sg+Ins: appõnõks
    appõn+N+Sg+Ill: appõnõ
    appõn+N+Sg+Ine: appõnõs
    appõn+N+Sg+Ela: appõnõst
    appõn+N+Pl+Nom: appõnd
    appõn+N+Pl+Gen: appõnd
    appõn+N+Pl+Dat: appõndõn
    appõn+N+Pl+Par: appiņi
    appõn+N+Pl+Ins: appõndõks
    appõn+N+Pl+Ill: appiņiž
    appõn+N+Pl+Ine: appiņis
    appõn+N+Pl+Ela: appiņist
